Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,123
Fire or explosion loss; investigation; when.

When an insurance company has reason to believe that a fire loss or explosion loss in which it has an interest may be of other than accidental cause, the company shall, in writing, notify the State Fire Marshal or any local fire department investigation division and request an investigation. The company shall provide the State Fire Marshal or any local fire department investigation division with any or all material developed from the company's inquiry into the fire loss or explosion loss. If an insurance company provides the State Fire Marshal or any local fire department investigation division with notice of a fire loss or explosion loss, such notice shall be sufficient for the purpose of sections 81-5,115 to 81-5,131.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 9.